Missouri, session 2026, HB2774.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 1, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 1.2060, to read as follows:
1.2060. 1. Neither the state nor any political subdivision thereof shall make any
law, rule, regulation, or ordinance that restricts the sale or use of any of the following
based on fuel source:
(1) Motor vehicles, as defined in section 301.010;
(2) Tools including, but not limited to, generators, lawn mowers, pressure
washers, chain saws, leaf blowers, and weed trimmers; and
(3) Farm equipment, as defined in section 407.838.
2. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit any city with more than
sixteen thousand but fewer than eighteen thousand inhabitants and that is the county
seat of a county with more than one million inhabitants from prohibiting the use of a
gas-powered leaf blower by law, rule, regulation, or ordinance.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.